Utah statutes.
76-6-412 (Superseded 11/01/10).   Theft -- Classification of offenses -- Action for treble damages.

(1)  Theft of property and services as provided in this chapter shall be punishable:

(a)  as a felony of the second degree if the:

(i)  value of the property or services is or exceeds $5,000;

(ii)  property stolen is a firearm or an operable motor vehicle;

(iii)  actor is armed with a dangerous weapon, as defined in Section 76-1-601, at the time of the theft; or

(iv)  property is stolen from the person of another;

(b)  as a felony of the third degree if:

(i)  the value of the property or services is or exceeds $1,000 but is less than $5,000;

(ii)  the actor has been twice before convicted of theft, any robbery, or any burglary with intent to commit theft; or

(iii)  in a case not amounting to a second-degree felony, the property taken is a stallion, mare, colt, gelding, cow, heifer, steer, ox, bull, calf, sheep, goat, mule, jack, jenny, swine, poultry, or a fur-bearing animal raised for commercial purposes;

(c)  as a class A misdemeanor if the value of the property stolen is or exceeds $300 but is less than $1,000; or

(d)  as a class B misdemeanor if the value of the property stolen is less than $300.

(2)  Any person who violates Subsection 76-6-408(1) or Section 76-6-413, or commits theft of property described in Subsection 76-6-412(1)(b)(iii), is civilly liable for three times the amount of actual damages, if any sustained by the plaintiff, and for costs of suit and reasonable attorneys' fees.

